Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.060

Result of failure to attend.

If any person duly served with a subpoena and obliged to attend as a witness, shall fail to do so, without any reasonable excuse, he or she shall be liable to the aggrieved party for all damages occasioned by such failure, to be recovered in a civil action.

[ 2011 c 336 s 143; Code 1881 s 398; 1877 p 88 s 400; 1869 p 106 s 393; 1854 p 188 s 300; RRS s 1220, part. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 399; 1877 p 88 s 401; 1869 p 106 s 394; 1854 p 188 s 301; RRS s 1220, part, now codified as RCW 5.56.061.]

NOTES:

Contempts: Chapter 7.21 RCW.

District court, damages for nonappearance: RCW 12.16.050.